sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjska orodja in pripomočki > Dodatki za kuhinjski termometer: Orodja za umerjanje; Sponke in nosilci za montažo; Nadomestne sonde; Etuiji in ovitki za termometre; Brezžični sprejemniki
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksverktyg och köksgeråd > Tillbehör för kökstermometrar: Kalibreringsverktyg; Monteringsklämmor och -hållare; Utbytessonder; Termometerfodral och -hylsor; Trådlösa mottagare
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukengereedschap > Accessoires voor kookthermometers: Kalibratiemiddelen; Montageclips en houders; Vervangende sondes; Hoezen en etuis voor thermometers; Draadloze ontvangers
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai eszközök és edények > Főzésihőmérő-kiegészítők: Kalibrációs eszközök; Rögzítőkapcsok és tartók; Csereszondák; Hőmérőtokok és védőhüvelyek; Vezeték nélküli vevők
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방용품 > 조리용 온도계 부대용품: 교정 도구; 마운팅 클립 및 홀더; 교체용 프로브; 온도계 케이스 및 슬리브; 무선 수신기
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski alati i pribor > Pribor za kulinarske termometre: Alati za kalibraciju; Stezaljke i držači za montiranje; Zamjenske sonde; Futrole i navlake za termometre; Bežični prijemnici
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiövälineet ja tarvikkeet > Ruuanlaittolämpömittarin lisätarvikkeet: Kalibrointityökalut; Kiinnitysklipsit ja -pidikkeet; Vaihtoanturit; Lämpömittarien suojat ja kotelot; Langattomat vastaanottimet
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės įrankiai > Maisto termometrų priedai: Kalibravimo įrankiai; Tvirtinimo spaustukai ir laikikliai; Atsarginiai zondai; Termometrų dėklai ir futliarai; Belaidžiai imtuvai
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски инструменти и прибори > Аксесоари за готварски термометър: Инструменти за калибриране; Монтажни щипки и държачи; Резервни сонди за готварски термометър; Калъфи и ръкави за термометри; Безжични приемници
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Ustensiles et accessoires de cuisine > Accessoires pour thermomètres de cuisson: Outils d’étalonnage; Clips et supports de fixation; Sondes de remplacement; Étuis et housses pour thermomètres; Récepteurs sans fil
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Instrumente și ustensile de bucătărie > Accesorii termometre pentru gătit: Ustensile de calibrare; Cleme și suporturi de montare; Sonde de schimb; Huse și protecții pentru termometre; Receptoare wireless
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Tools & Utensils > Cooking Thermometer Accessories: Calibration Tools; Mounting Clips & Holders; Replacement Probes; Thermometer Cases & Sleeves; Wireless Receivers
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Εργαλεία & σκεύη κουζίνας > Εξαρτήματα θερμομέτρων μαγειρικής: Εργαλεία βαθμονόμησης; Κλιπ & βάσεις στήριξης; Ανταλλακτικοί αισθητήρες; Θήκες & καλύμματα θερμομέτρων; Ασύρματοι δέκτες
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenredskaber > Tilbehør til stegetermometer: Kalibreringsværktøjer; Monteringsclips og -holdere; Reservestegetermometre; Termometeretuier og -holdere; Trådløse modtagere
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské náradie a riad > Príslušenstvo ku kuchynskému teplomeru: Kalibračné nástroje; Montážne spony a kolíky; Náhradné sondy; Puzdrá a obaly na teplomery; Bezdrôtové prijímače
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン用品・調理器具 > 料理用温度計関連用品: 校正ツール; 取り付け用クリップ・ホルダー; 交換用プローブ; 温度計用ケース・スリーブ; ワイヤレスレシーバー
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Strumenti e utensili cucina > Accessori per termometri da cucina: Strumenti di calibrazione; Clip e supporti di montaggio; Sonde di ricambio; Termometro cassa e manicotti; Ricevitori senza fili
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房工具和用具 > 烹飪溫度計配件: 校準工具; 安裝夾與固定座; 替換針頭; 溫度計保護套; 無線接收器
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Herramientas y utensilios de cocina > Accesorios para termómetros de cocina: Herramientas de calibración; Clips y soportes de montaje; Sondas de repuesto; Fundas y estuches para termómetros; Receptores inalámbricos
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Acessórios de termómetro de cozinha: Ferramentas de calibração; Clipes e suportes de montagem; Sondas de substituição; Caixas e bolsas para termómetros; Recetores sem fio
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenverktøy og bestikk > Tilbehør til matlagningstermometere: Kalibreringsverktøy; Monteringsklips og -holdere; Erstatningsprober; Termometerhylser og -ermer; Trådløse mottakere
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная утварь > Аксессуары для кулинарных термометров: Инструменты для калибровки; Зажимы и держатели; Щупы для термометров; Чехлы и футляры для термометров; Беспроводные приемники
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Gereçleri ve Aletleri > Pişirme Termometresi Aksesuarları: Kalibrasyon Araçları; Montaj Klipsleri ve Tutucular; Yedek Problar; Termometre Kılıfları; Kablosuz Alıcılar
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房工具/用具 > 烹饪温度计配件: 校准工具; 安装夹和支架; 替换探头; 温度计保护盒/套; 无线接收器
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské nástroje a vybavení > Kuchyňské teploměry – příslušenství: Kalibrační nástroje; Montážní skřipce a držáky; Náhradní sondy; Pouzdra a obaly na teploměry; Bezdrátové přijímače
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Acessórios para termômetro de cozinha: Ferramentas de calibração; Clipes e suportes de montagem; Sondas de reposição; Capas e estojos para termômetros; Receptores sem fio
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nhà bếp > Phụ kiện nhiệt kế nấu ăn: Công cụ hiệu chuẩn; Kẹp & Giá Đỡ Gắn; Đầu dò thay thế; Bao đựng và vỏ bảo vệ nhiệt kế; Bộ thu không dây
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องมือและเครื่องใช้ในครัว > อุปกรณ์วัดอุณหภูมิอาหาร: เครื่องมือวัด; คลิปและตัวยึดสำหรับติดตั้ง; เครื่องวัดแบบโพรบสำรอง; กล่องและปลอกหุ้มเทอร์โมมิเตอร์; เครื่องรับสัญญาณไร้สาย
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Narzędzia i sprzęty kuchenne > Akcesoria do termometrów kuchennych: Narzędzia do kalibracji; Klipsy i uchwyty; Sondy zamienne; Etui i osłony na termometry; Odbiorniki bezprzewodowe
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchenhelfer & -utensilien > Küchenthermometer-Zubehör: Kalibrierungswerkzeuge; Befestigungsklammern & Halterungen; Ersatzsonden; Thermometer-Etuis und -hüllen; Drahtlose Empfänger